Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Board of Directors

Issue of directors' salaries raised by complaint that directors fraudulently diverted corporate funds. —

In a stockholder's derivative action, the fact that the defendants-directors had voted themselves salary increases, as well as the reasonableness of such compensation, lay properly within the knowledge of the directors. The plaintiff-stockholder complained that the directors had breached their fiduciary obligations by diverting funds from the corporation to its detriment. This allegation sufficed to inform the defendants that an issue existed as to the reasonableness of the executive salaries. Lynch v. Patterson, 701 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1985).

Reasonableness of increased executive salaries, due to “increased responsibilities,” not established. —

In a stockholder's derivative action, the defendants-directors-corporate officers did not establish the reasonableness of their executive salaries, which were doubled as a result of “increased responsibilities,” in that they did not specify what these responsibilities entailed, presented no evidence of increased earnings, did not attempt to establish how their salaries compared with those of executives in similar businesses, nor explain increasing their salaries while refusing to declare a dividend for nonexecutive shareholders. Lynch v. Patterson, 701 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1985).

Burden on director to establish that contract beneficial to him also serves corporation. —

In a stockholder's derivative action, a director bore the burden of establishing that a contract under which he benefited also served the best interests of the corporation. Lynch v. Patterson, 701 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1985).

Directors receiving unlawful gain responsible for paying back amount due. —

In a stockholder's derivative action, the court properly allocated the responsibility for payment of the amount due the minority stockholder resulting from improper fiduciary activities of the directors between the two directors receiving the unlawful gain; the stockholder's action against the third director, who was not a stockholder and who did not receive any improper payment, was properly dismissed. Lynch v. Patterson, 701 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1985).

And pro-rata recovery by individual stockholder, instead of corporation, permitted. —

In a stockholder's derivative suit, the court properly refused to order payment into the corporation, which would have simply returned the funds to the wrongdoers, the board of directors, who managed the corporation and held 70% of the stock, and instead permitted pro-rata recovery by the individual stockholder. Lynch v. Patterson, 701 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Inherent Authority of a Corporate President in Wyoming,” see V Wyo. L.J. 93 (1950).

For note, “The Fiduciary Relationship of the Corporate Director to the Individual Shareholder,” see XIII Wyo. L.J. 140 (1959).

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

For article, “Corporate Disloyalty — A Wyoming Case and the ALI Project,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 111 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18B Am. Jur. 2d Corporations §§ 1455 to 1714.

Provision authorizing directors to fill vacancies as applicable to newly created directorships, 6 ALR2d 174.

Purchase of claims against corporation by director thereof, 13 ALR2d 1172.

Directors' right to inspect books and records, 15 ALR2d 11.

Validity of contract between corporations as affected by directors in common, 33 ALR2d 1060.

Applicability of statute of frauds to promise by director to pay debt of corporation, 35 ALR2d 906.

Oral evidence as to proceedings at meetings of directors of private corporations, 48 ALR2d 1259.

Validity of agreement in conjunction with sale of corporate shares that majority of directors will be replaced by purchaser's designees, 13 ALR3d 361.

Validity of stockholders' agreement allegedly infringing on directors' management powers — modern cases, 15 ALR4th 1078.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity,” 16 ALR4th 784.

Fairness to corporation where “corporate opportunity” is allegedly usurped by officer or director, 17 ALR4th 479.

Relief other than by dissolution in cases of intracorporate deadlock or dissension, 34 ALR4th 13.

Validity, construction, and effect of “regulatory exclusion” in directors' and officers' liability insurance policy, 21 ALR5th 292.

Prohibition of interlocking directorates between competing corporations under Section 8 of Clayton Act (15 USC § 19), 60 ALR Fed 129.

19 C.J.S. Corporations §§ 433 to 553.

§ 17-16-801.
Requirement for and functions of board of directors.

Except as provided in W.S.

17-16-732

, each corporation shall have a board of directors.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of the board of directors of the corporation, and the business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed by or under the direction, and subject to the oversight, of its board of directors, subject to any limitation set forth in the articles of incorporation or in an agreement authorized under W.S.

17-16-732

.

In the case of a public corporation, the board’s oversight responsibilities include attention to:

Business performance and plans;

Major risks to which the corporation is or may be exposed;

The performance and compensation of the chief executive officer;

Policies and practices to foster the corporation’s compliance with law and ethical conduct;

Preparation of the corporation’s financial statements;

The effectiveness of the corporation’s internal controls;

Arrangements for providing adequate and timely information to directors; and

The composition of the board and its committees, taking into account the important role of independent directors.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), added “the board of directors of the corporation,” substituted “shall be managed by or under the direction, and subject to the oversight, of” for “managed under the direction of”; added (c), and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Loan not authorized by board not valid debt of corporation. —

See J Bar H, Inc. v. Johnson, 822 P.2d 849,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1991).

Loans enforceable where impliedly ratified. —

Loans made by director to corporation were enforceable corporate debts where ratification of transactions by formal board action was not possible but minority shareholder had full knowledge and minority shareholder and corporation impliedly ratified transactions both by acquiescing in them and by accepting benefits thereunder. Lahnston v. Second Chance Ranch Co., 968 P.2d 32,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1998).

Corporate president not authorized to execute satisfaction of judgment. —

When a corporation obtained a judgment against its former president for stealing corporate funds, his successor, who was also alleged to have similarly disposed of corporate assets, was not authorized, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-16-801(b), to execute a satisfaction of the judgment against the former president for no consideration because such acts were not part of the corporation's ordinary business, as it was primarily involved in construction, and the former president was not an innocent third party dealing with the corporation. Woods v. Wells Fargo Bank, 2004 WY 61, 90 P.3d 724,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 22, 2004).

Applied

in

Metz Beverage Co. v. Wyo. Beverages, Inc., 2002 WY 21,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 20

, 39 P.3d 1051 (Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The New Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement; Should Your Corporation Elect Statutory Close Corporation Status?,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 589 (1990).

For article, “Ethical Considerations When Representing Organizations,” see 3 Wyo. L. Rev. 581 (2003).

§ 17-16-802.
Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-803.
Number and election of directors.

A board of directors shall consist of one (1) or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to, or in the manner provided in, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Directors are elected at the first annual shareholders’ meeting and at each annual meeting thereafter unless their terms are staggered under W.S.

17-16-806

.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may establish a variable range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a variable range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time within the minimum and maximum, by the shareholders or the board of directors. After shares are issued, only the shareholders may change the range for the size of the board or change from a fixed to a variable-range size board or vice versa.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to voting of shares for directors, see §

17-16-728

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (b) to change the way in which number of directors may be increased or decreased.

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-804.
Election of directors by certain classes of shareholders.

If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified number of directors by the holders of one (1) or more authorized classes of shares. A class or classes of shares entitled to elect one (1) or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-805.
Terms of directors generally.

The terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

The terms of all other directors expire at the next, or if their terms are staggered in accordance with W.S.

17-16-806

, at the applicable second or third, annual shareholders’ meeting following their election except to the extent:

Provided in W.S.

17-16-1022

if a bylaw electing to be governed by that section is in effect; or

A shorter term is specified in the articles of incorporation in the event of a director nominee failing to receive a specified vote for election.

A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director’s term.

The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy expires at the next shareholders’ meeting at which directors are elected.

Despite the expiration of a director’s term, he continues to serve until his successor is elected and qualifies or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (b), which read: “The terms of all other directors expire at the next annual shareholders' meeting following their election unless their terms are staggered under W.S.

17-16-806

.”

§ 17-16-806.
Staggered terms for directors.

The articles of incorporation may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into two (2) or three (3) groups, with each group containing one-half (1/2) or one-third (1/3) of the total, as near as may be practicable. In that event, the terms of directors in the first group expire at the first annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, the terms of the second group expire at the second annual shareholders’ meeting after their election, and the terms of the third group, if any, expire at the third annual shareholders’ meeting after their election. At each annual shareholders’ meeting held thereafter, directors shall be chosen for a term of two (2) years or three (3) years, as the case may be, to succeed those whose terms expire.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence, deleted “If there are three (3) or more directors” at the beginning, substituted “the terms of directors” for “their terms” and added “practicable” at the end.

§ 17-16-807.
Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by written notice or by electronic transmission delivered to the board of directors, its chairman, or to the corporation.

A resignation is effective when the resignation is delivered unless the resignation specifies a later effective date or an effective date determined upon the happening of an event or events. A resignation that is conditioned upon failing to receive a specified vote for election as a director may provide that it is irrevocable.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2005, ch. 51, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “or by electronic transmission delivered” after “written notice,” and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (b) to expand the description of effective date.

§ 17-16-808.
Removal of directors by shareholders.

The shareholders may remove one (1) or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove that director.

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against his removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove the director exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove the director.

A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “that director” or similar language for “him” throughout the section.

§ 17-16-809.
Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

The district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office, or if none in this state, its registered office, is located may remove a director of the corporation from office in a proceeding commenced by or in the right of the corporation if the court finds that:

The director engaged in fraudulent conduct with respect to the corporation or its shareholders, grossly abused the position of director, or intentionally inflicted harm on the corporation; and

Considering the director’s course of conduct and the inadequacy of other available remedies, removal would be in the best interest of the corporation.

A shareholder proceeding on behalf of the corporation under subsection (a) of this section shall comply with all of the requirements of W.S.

17-16-740

through

17-16-747

excluding W.S. 17-16-741(a)(i).

The court in addition to removing a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

Nothing in this section limits the equitable powers of the court to order other relief including, but not limited to, an award of expenses.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a) through (c) regarding procedure for removing director; and added (d).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-810.
Vacancy on board.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The shareholders may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

If the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders, and only the directors elected by that voting group are entitled to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the directors.

A vacancy that will occur at a later date, by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under W.S. 17-16-807(b) or otherwise, may be filled before the vacancy occurs but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and only the directors elected by that voting group are entitled to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the directors” in (b); and deleted “specific” after “occur at a” in (c).

§ 17-16-811.
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.